Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2847
Verification, defined.

(1) Verification means the confirmation by a supervising pharmacist of the accuracy and completeness of the acts, tasks, or functions undertaken by a pharmacy technician to assist the pharmacist in the practice of pharmacy.

(2) Verification shall occur by a pharmacist on duty in the facility, except that verification may occur by means of a real-time audiovisual communication system if (a) a pharmacy technician performs authorized activities or functions to assist a pharmacist and the prescribed drugs or devices will be administered to persons who are patients or residents of a facility by a credentialed individual authorized to administer medications, (b) a pharmacy technician is engaged in remote dispensing in compliance with section 71-436.02, or (c) all of the following conditions are met: (i) The pharmacist performing the verification is located in Nebraska, (ii) the physical product verification occurs in person at the location where the prescription is prepared, and (iii) the pharmacy maintains manual or electronic records that identify, individually for each order processed, the name, initials, or identification code of each pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or pharmacy technician who took part in all acts, tasks, or functions undertaken to fulfill a prescription.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 943;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 73;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 15.